California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.1.

“Powdered alcohol” means an alcohol prepared or sold in a powder or crystalline form that is used for human consumption in that form or reconstituted as an alcoholic beverage when mixed with water or any other liquid. “Powdered alcohol” does not include “vaporized alcohol,” as defined in Section 25621.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 742, Sec. 1.   (AB 1554)   Effective January 1, 2017.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.1.

“Powdered alcohol” means an alcohol prepared or sold in a powder or crystalline form that is used for human consumption
 in that form or reconstituted as an alcoholic beverage when mixed with water or any other liquid. “Powdered alcohol” does not include “vaporized alcohol,” as defined in Section 25621.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23004.

“Alcoholic beverage” includes alcohol, spirits, liquor, wine, beer, and every liquid or solid containing alcohol, spirits, wine, or beer, and which contains one-half of 1 percent or more of alcohol by volume and which is fit for beverage purposes either alone or when diluted, mixed, or combined with other substances. “Alcoholic beverage” does not include “powdered alcohol,” as defined in Section 23003.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23005.

“Distilled spirits” means an alcoholic beverage obtained by the distillation of fermented agricultural products, and includes alcohol for beverage use, spirits of wine, whiskey, rum, brandy, and gin, including all dilutions and mixtures thereof. “Distilled spirits” does not include “powdered alcohol,” as defined in Section 23003.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 778, Sec. 3.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23006.

“Beer” means any alcoholic beverage obtained by the fermentation of any infusion or decoction of barley, malt, hops, or any other similar product, or any combination thereof in water, and includes ale, porter, brown, stout, lager beer, small beer, and strong beer, but does not include sake, known as Japanese rice wine. Beer may be produced using the following materials as adjuncts in fermentation: honey, fruit, fruit juice, fruit concentrate, herbs, spices,
 and other food materials. Beer aged in an empty wooden barrel previously used to contain wine or distilled spirits shall be defined exclusively as “beer” and shall not be considered a dilution or mixture of any other alcoholic beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 60, Sec. 1.   (AB 205)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

23007.

“Wine” means the product obtained from normal alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound ripe grapes or other agricultural products containing natural or added sugar or any such alcoholic beverage to which is added grape brandy, fruit brandy, or spirits of wine, which is distilled from the particular agricultural product or products of which the wine is made and other rectified wine products and by whatever name and which does not contain more than 15 percent added flavoring, coloring, and blending material and which contains not more than 24 percent of alcohol by volume, and includes vermouth and sake, known as Japanese rice wine.

Nothing contained in this section affects or limits the power, authority, or duty of the State Department of Health Services in the enforcement of the laws directed toward preventing the manufacture, production, sale, or transportation of adulterated, misbranded, or mislabeled alcoholic beverages, and the definition of “wine” contained in this section is limited strictly to the purposes of this division and does not extend to, or repeal by implication, any law preventing the production, manufacture, sale, or transportation of adulterated, misbranded, or mislabeled alcoholic beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 429.)
-------------------------------------------

23008.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, copartnership, joint adventure, association, corporation, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, syndicate, or any other group or combination acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23009.

“Licensee” means any person holding a license, a permit, a certification, or any other authorization issued by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23010.

“Taxpayer” means a person liable for the payment of a tax pursuant to Part 14 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

23011.

“Salesman” means any individual who solicits or receives an order for alcoholic beverages from any licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23012.

“Beer manufacturer” means any person that has facilities and equipment for the purposes of, and is engaged in, the commercial manufacture of beer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

23013.

“Winegrower” means any person who has facilities and equipment for the conversion of grapes, berries, or other fruit into wine and is engaged in the production of wine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   Effective June 6, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23013.5.

A “wine blender” is a person authorized to operate a bonded wine cellar pursuant to a permit issued for that purpose under the Internal Revenue Laws of the United States but who does not have facilities or equipment for the conversion of grapes, berries or other fruit into wine and does not engage in the production of wine in commercial quantities, provided that any person who produces or blends not to exceed 200 gallons of wine per year shall not, because of such production or blending, be considered a wine blender within the meaning of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 499.)
-------------------------------------------

23014.

“Brandy manufacturer” means any person engaged in the manufacture of brandy only and not in the manufacture of any other distilled spirits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23015.

“Distilled spirits manufacturer” means a person who produces distilled spirits from naturally fermented materials or in any other manner. “Distilled spirits manufacturer” does not include a winegrower that produces spirits of wine, provided the spirits of wine are blended into wine produced by the winegrower, are sold to an industrial alcohol dealer or a distilled spirits manufacturer, or are destroyed by the winegrower.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 375, Sec. 1.   (AB 1704)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23016.

“Rectifier” means every person who colors, flavors, or otherwise processes distilled spirits by distillation, blending, percolating, or other processes. “Rectifier” does not include an on-sale licensee that colors, flavors, or blends distilled spirits or wine products on the on-sale licensed premises to be consumed on the licensed premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 301, Sec. 1.   (SB 32)   Effective September 21, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

23017.

“Importer” means:

(a) Any consignee of alcoholic beverages brought into this State from without this State, when the alcoholic beverages are for delivery or use within this State.

(b) Any person, except a public warehouse licensed under this division, to whom delivery is first made in this State of alcoholic beverages brought into this State from without this State for delivery or use within this State.

(c) Any person, licensed as an importer, selling alcoholic beverages to nonlicensees
 within an area over which the United States Government exercises jurisdiction, when delivery of the alcoholic beverages is made to the nonlicensees by a common carrier transporting the alcoholic beverages from a point outside this State.

(d) Any person bringing alcoholic beverages into this State from without this State which are not consigned to any person and which are for delivery or use within this State.

A person licensed as a customs broker who is acting as an agent for a licensed importer or for another person whose place of business is without the State shall not be deemed to be the importer of alcoholic beverages consigned in United States internal revenue bond or in United States customs bond to the licensed customs broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23018.

“Exporter” means any person who sells, delivers, or consigns alcoholic beverages located within this State for delivery, use, or sale without the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23019.

“Customs broker” means every person who is authorized to act as agent or broker for a person licensed as an importer or for a person whose place of business is without the State, in regard to the importing of alcoholic beverages into the State in United States internal revenue bond or in United States customs bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23020.

“Wine broker” means every person, other than a salesman who is regularly employed by a licensee, who engages as an agent in the sale or purchase of wine for or on behalf of another or others for a fee or commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23021.

“Wholesaler” means every person other than a manufacturer, winegrower or rectifier who is engaged in business as a jobber or wholesale merchant, dealing in alcoholic beverages, in an area within the United States other than a territory or possession of the United States, or within a foreign country having common boundaries with any state of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 597.)
-------------------------------------------

23022.

“Industrial alcohol dealer” means a person who sells alcohol or distilled spirits in packages of more than one gallon for use in the trades, professions, or industries, but not for beverage use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23023.

“Retailer” means any on- or off-sale licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23024.

“Retailer’s on-sale license” means on-sale beer licenses, on-sale beer and wine licenses, on-sale general licenses, and on-sale general licenses for seasonal businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23025.

“Sell” or “sale” and “to sell” includes any transaction whereby, for any consideration, title to alcoholic beverages is transferred from one person to another, and includes the delivery of alcoholic beverages pursuant to an order placed for the purchase of such beverages and soliciting or receiving an order for such beverages, but does not include the return of alcoholic beverages by a licensee to the licensee from whom such beverages were purchased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23026.

“Retail sale” or “sale at retail” means the sale by an on- or off-sale licensee for consumption and not for resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23027.

“Wholesale sale” or “sale at wholesale” means a sale to any licensee for purposes of resale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23028.

“Package” means any container or receptacle used for holding alcoholic beverages which is corked or sealed with a stub, stopper, cap, or in any other manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23029.

“Case” or “original case” means a standard box or carton as packed by the manufacturer or wine grower in which packages of alcoholic beverages are shipped or transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23030.

“To bottle” or “to package” means to bottle, barrel, or otherwise place alcoholic beverages in a container.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23031.

“Gallon” or “wine gallon” means that liquid measure containing 231 cubic inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953.   Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23032.

“Proof spirits” means that alcoholic liquor which contains one-half of its volume of pure ethyl alcohol of a specific gravity of 0.7939 at 60 degrees Fahrenheit, referred to water at 60 degrees Fahrenheit as unity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23033.

“Proof gallon” means a gallon of proof spirits or an equivalent amount of alcohol.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23034.

“Still” means any apparatus capable of being used for separating alcohol, or alcoholic vapors or solutions from alcohol or alcoholic solutions or mixtures, but does not include stills or apparatus used for laboratory purposes or solely in the production of distilled water or substances other than alcoholic beverages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

23035.

“Private warehouse” means any place maintained by a licensee, other than his licensed premises, for the storage but not for the sale of alcohol or alcoholic beverages owned by the licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.

“Public warehouse” means any place licensed for the storage of, but not the sale of, alcohol or alcoholic beverages for the account of other licensees and includes United States custom bonded warehouses and United States internal revenue bonded warehouses when the bonded warehouses are used for storage of alcoholic beverages for the account of another licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23037.

“Club” means a corporation or association which is the owner, lessee, or occupant of an establishment operated solely for objects of a social or athletic nature but not for pecuniary gain, having a bona fide membership list, and the majority of the members of which pay dues at least once in every year, and the property as well as the advantages of which belong to the members, and which sells alcoholic beverages only to its members and its bona fide guests. A guest is defined as a person who is actually a houseguest, or a person whose presence as a guest is in response to a specific invitation for the special occasion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

23038.

“Bona fide public eating place” means a place which is regularly and in a bona fide manner used and kept open for the serving of meals to guests for compensation and which has suitable kitchen facilities connected therewith, containing conveniences for cooking an assortment of foods which may be required for ordinary meals, the kitchen of which must be kept in a sanitary condition with the proper amount of refrigeration for keeping of food on said premises and must comply with all the regulations of the local department of health. “Meals” means the usual assortment of foods commonly ordered at various hours of the day; the service of such food and victuals only as sandwiches
 or salads shall not be deemed a compliance with this requirement. “Guests” shall mean persons who, during the hours when meals are regularly served therein, come to a bona fide public eating place for the purpose of obtaining, and actually order and obtain at such time, in good faith, a meal therein. Nothing in this section, however, shall be construed to require that any food be sold or purchased with any beverage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1779.)
-------------------------------------------

23038.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23038, “bona fide public eating place” also means a convention center, exhibit hall, or auditorium, which shall hereinafter be referred to as “premises,” owned by or leased to the State of California, any incorporated city, county, city and county, or public corporation of the State of California which is regularly and in a bona fide manner used and kept open for the attendance of groups of guests, and in connection with such use serves meals to such groups of guests for compensation, and which has suitable kitchen facilities in connection therewith, such kitchen containing conveniences for preparation of ordinary meals and maintained
 in a sanitary condition with proper refrigeration for the keeping of food on the premises in compliance with all regulations of the local department of health.

“Meals,” as used in this section, means foods commonly ordered at a lunch or dinner; provided, however, that the service of food such as sandwiches or salads only shall not be deemed compliance with this requirement.

“Groups of guests,” as used in this section, means persons who come to the premises owned or leased as provided herein, to make use of such premises for the purpose or purposes for which it was designed, and in connection with such use may, as a group, order in advance and obtain or be served a meal therein.

“Convention center” as used in this section, means a building or group of buildings in close physical proximity consisting of, but not necessarily limited to, a convention hall, exhibit hall, auditorium, or
 theater, or any combination thereof, and used for the purpose, among other things, of providing facilities for conventions, theatrical productions, shows, sporting centers, exhibits, displays, conferences or meetings.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that meals be served every day that use is made of the premises or any part thereof. However, meals shall actually be available to groups of guests in good faith upon adequate notice and request to the operators of such premises on any day of any year that such premises are used by such groups of guests, and shall be served to groups of guests as heretofore provided on at least 25 percent of the total days each year that the premises are used by said groups of guests.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that any food be sold or purchased with any alcoholic beverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

23038.2.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23038, for purposes of issuing an on-sale beer and wine license only, “bona fide public eating place” also means a ball park, stadium, or coliseum featuring professional sporting events which maintains suitable kitchen facilities for the preparation of food which is offered for sale to persons attending such professional sporting events.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control may prescribe specific types and sizes of beer and wine containers which may be sold pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

23038.3.

Notwithstanding Section 23038, for purposes of issuing an on-sale beer and wine license only, “bona fide public eating place” also means a cooking school that regularly and in a bona fide manner provides courses of instruction in the preparation of food, and that maintains suitable kitchen facilities for the preparation of food that is offered to persons attending the courses of instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 702, Sec. 1.   (SB 339)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23039.

(a) “Public premises” means:

(1) Premises licensed with any type of license other than an on-sale beer license, and maintained and operated for the selling or serving of alcoholic beverages to the public for consumption on the premises, and in which food shall not be sold or served to the public as in a bona fide public eating place, but upon which premises food products may be sold or served incidentally to the sale or service of alcoholic beverages, in accordance with rules prescribed by the department.

(2) Premises licensed with an on-sale beer license, in which food shall not be sold or served to the public as in a bona fide public eating place, and in which sandwiches, salads, desserts, and
 similar short orders shall not be sold and served, in accordance with rules prescribed by the department.

(b) “Public premises” does not include any of the following:

(1) Railroad dining or club cars, passenger ships, airplanes, or bona fide clubs after the clubs have been lawfully operated for not less than one year.

(2) Historic units of the state park system.

(3) Premises being operated under a temporary on-sale beer license other than permitted pursuant to Section 24045.5, or on-sale beer licensed stadia, auditoria, fairgrounds, or racetracks.

(4) Nonprofit theater companies, nonprofit radio broadcasting companies, or nonprofit cultural film exhibition companies licensed pursuant to
 Section 24045.7.

(5) Theaters licensed pursuant to Section 24045.75.

(6) Cemeteries licensed pursuant to Section 24045.76.

(7) Winegrowers’ premises.

(8) Licensed premises of a nonprofit arts foundation licensed pursuant to Section 24045.78.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 1370)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23039.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any on-sale beer and wine public premises licensee who has been licensed at premises operated as a cabaret theater for at least 10 years and which has a seating capacity for at least 375 patrons may admit persons under the age of 21 years to theater performances provided that alcoholic beverages are not sold, served, or consumed on the premises during those performances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 18, Sec. 1.   Effective June 2, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23039.5.

“Entertainment zone” means a zone created by a city, county, or city and county ordinance on or after January 1, 2025, that authorizes consumption of one or more types of alcoholic beverages on public streets, sidewalks, or public rights-of-way.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 869, Sec. 1.   (SB 969)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23040.

“Within this State” means all territory within the boundaries of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23041.

“Without the State” means all territory without the boundaries of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23042.

“Board” means the State Board of Equalization, in the exercise of the powers and duties with respect to excise taxes reserved to it by Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23043.

“Department” means the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, and “director” means the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23044.

“License” means a license authorized to be issued by the department pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23045.

“Appeals board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23046.

“Air common carrier” means a person engaged in regularly scheduled air transportation between fixed termini under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the Civil Aeronautics Board, or its successor, or the Public Utilities Commission, or its successor, and “airplane” or “common carrier airplane” means an airplane operated in air transportation by an air common carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 607.)
-------------------------------------------

23047.

“Scheduled flight” means a regularly scheduled and advertised flight of an air common carrier but does not mean each daily operation of airplanes upon such flight.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23046 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Administration [23049. - 23098.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control [23049. - 23058.]

23049.

It is the intention of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide a governmental organization which will ensure a strict, honest, impartial, and uniform administration and enforcement of the liquor laws throughout the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23050.

(a) There is in the state government, in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, a Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control. The department shall be administered through a civil executive officer who shall be known as the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control. The director shall be appointed and shall serve as provided in Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution and shall receive an annual salary as provided for by Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 5.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23051.

On and after January 1, 1955, the department shall succeed to all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction now conferred on the State Board of Equalization under Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution and this division, except the power to assess and collect such excise taxes as are or may be imposed by law on account of the manufacture, importation, and sale of alcoholic beverages in this State, which shall remain the exclusive power of the State Board of Equalization.

All other laws heretofore or hereafter applicable to the State Board of Equalization with respect to alcoholic beverages, except as to
 excise taxes, shall hereafter be construed to apply to the department.

Any license issued by the board and in effect on December 31, 1954, shall be deemed on and after January 1, 1955, to be a license of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23052.

The provisions of Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code shall govern and apply to the conduct of the department in every respect the same as if such provisions were herein set forth at length, and wherever in that chapter the term “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, for the purposes of this section it shall mean the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23053.

The director shall be the appointing power of all employees within the department, and all heads of divisions, bureaus and other employees in the department shall be responsible to the director for the proper carrying out of the duties and responsibilities of their respective positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23053.1.

The director may bring an action to enjoin a violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this division, including, but not limited to, subdivision (e) of Section 24200 regarding a licensee’s failure to correct objectionable conditions following notice, or any rule promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this division. The action may be brought in the county in which the violation occurred or is threatened to occur. Any proceeding brought hereunder shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of
 the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 627, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

23053.5.

The department shall have the function of investigation of violations of Chapters 10, 11 and 15 of this division and rules of the department relating thereto. To the end that such provisions are more adequately and strictly enforced, funds for support of this program shall be derived as follows: In addition to fees otherwise provided for in this division, the following amounts shall be paid to the department by holders of the following types of licenses:(a) Retail package off-sale general license $24 per year(b) Rectifier’s license $52 per year(c) Distilled spirits wholesaler’s license $52 per year(d) Distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent’s license $52 per year(e) Distilled spirits manufacturer’s license $52 per year(f) Distilled spirits importer’s general li­cense $52 per year(g) California winegrower’s agent’s license $52 per yearPayment of those amounts shall be made upon issuance or transfer of these types of licenses, and shall be made by the holders of these types of licenses at the time specified in this division for payment of annual renewal fees therefor.

The provisions of Section 23322 shall apply to the amounts to be paid under this section. All money collected from the fees provided for in this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 900, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

23054.

All persons in the state civil service employed on the operative date hereof in the State Board of Equalization in carrying out functions transferred to the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control by this article are transferred to the department and retain their respective positions in the state civil service, subject to the provisions of Article XXIV of the Constitution and laws continued in force thereby or adopted pursuant thereto.

The transfer of personnel made by this section shall be subject to the power of the director, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, to reorganize the department, to discipline employees
 transferred for incompetency, inefficiency, inexcusable neglect of duty, prior or subsequent to the transfer, or for any other cause for discipline provided by law, and to lay off and demote employees for lack of funds, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23055.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, upon request from the Legislature, the director shall prepare and submit to the Legislature a report on the department’s activities and post the report on the department’s Internet Web site. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for
 any previous fiscal year requested by the Legislature:

(1) The amount of funds allocated and spent by the department for licensing, enforcement, and administration.

(2) The number of licenses issued, renewed, denied, suspended, and revoked, by license category.

(3) The average time for processing license applications, by license category.

(4) The number and type of enforcement activities conducted by the department and by local law enforcement agencies in conjunction with the department.

(5) The number, type, and amount of penalties, fines, and other disciplinary actions taken by the department.

(b) The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (SB 325)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

23056.

The department shall send a copy of the information sheet prepared by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to Section 2426 of the Vehicle Code with each renewal notice to any on-sale licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 838, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23057.

The department shall send, with each renewal notice to any on-sale or off-sale licensee, information regarding the use of persons under the age of 21 years by peace officers to apprehend licensees, or the employees or agents of licensees, who sell alcoholic beverages to persons under the age of 21 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 124, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

23058.

In order to facilitate the board’s administration of the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), the department shall, each quarter at no cost to the board, electronically transmit to the board a report on the licenses issued or transferred pursuant to this division. The report shall include the names and addresses of all persons to whom the license is issued or transferred, the type of license issued or transferred, and the effective date of the license or transfer. With respect to transfers, the
 report shall additionally include the names and addresses of the transferors. The information shall be transmitted to the board in a format agreed upon by both the board and the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 172, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prohibited Activity [23060. - 23060.]

23060.

Neither the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control nor any member of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board shall have or do any of the following:

(a) Receive any commission or profit whatsoever, directly or indirectly, from any person applying for or receiving any license or permit under the Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.

(b) Engage or have any interest in the sale or any insurance covering a licensee’s business or premises.

(c) Engage or have any interest in the sale of equipment for use upon licensed premises.

(d) Knowingly solicit any licensee for the purchase of tickets for benefits or contributions for benefits.

(e) Knowingly request any licensee to donate or receive money, or any other thing of value, for the benefit of any person whatsoever.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be removed from office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board [23075. - 23077.]

23075.

(a) There is in the state government, in the Business and Consumer Services Agency, an Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board the members of which shall be appointed and shall serve as provided in Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution, and shall receive an annual salary as provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 6.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23076.

All personnel of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board shall be appointed, directed and controlled by the board. The director shall furnish the equipment, supplies, and housing necessary to the operation of the board and shall perform such other mechanics of administration as the board and the director may agree upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23077.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Appeals Board shall exercise such powers as are vested in it by Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution and may adopt such rules pertaining to appeals and other matters within its jurisdiction as may be required. The board and its duly authorized representatives in the performance of its duties under this chapter shall have the powers of a head of a department as set forth in Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Appeals From Decisions of the Department [23080. - 23089.]

23080.

As used in this article, “decision” when used in reference to the department means any final determination of the department imposing a penalty assessment or affecting a license which may be appealed to the board under Section 22 of Article XX of the California Constitution, and does not include any emergency decision for temporary, interim relief issued pursuant to the authority conferred to the department pursuant to Section 11460.10 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (SB 788)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23081.

On or before the tenth day after the last day on which reconsideration of a final decision of the department can be ordered, any party aggrieved by a final decision of the department may file an appeal with the board from such decision. The appeal shall be in writing and shall state the grounds upon which a review is sought. A copy of the appeal shall be served by the appellant to each party who appeared in the proceeding before the department, including the department which shall thereafter be treated in all respects as a party to the appeal. The right to appeal shall not be affected by failure to seek
 reconsideration before the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

23081.5.

An appeal to the board shall be deemed filed on the date it is received by the board electronically or by mail to the principal office; provided, however, an appeal mailed to the board by means of registered mail shall be deemed filed with the board on the date of the registry with the United
 States Post Office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 306, Sec. 2.   (AB 1589)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

23082.

No decision of the department shall become effective during the period in which an appeal may be filed and the filing of an appeal shall stay the effect of the decision until such time as a final order is made by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1954, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

23083.

(a) The board shall determine the appeal upon the record of the department and upon any briefs which may be filed by the parties. If any party to the appeal requests oral argument, the board shall schedule a date and time for argument. The board shall not receive any evidence other than that contained in the record of the proceedings of the department.
